Mississippi statutes. Title 65. Highways, Bridges and Ferries
General Provisions
§ 65-7-123.
Requirement on certain county roads for temporary center line safety stripes while undergoing reconstruction or maintenance.

Any segment of a county-maintained, hard-surfaced highway normally marked by center line safety stripes which is overlayed with hot mix asphalt while undergoing reconstruction or maintenance shall be marked with temporary center line safety stripes if permanent center line safety stripes will not be installed before such segment is opened for public use.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 367, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1994.

§ 65-7-125.
Mississippi Delta National Heritage Area authorized to erect signs and markers on public streets, roads, etc. within Heritage Area.

The management entity of the Mississippi Delta National Heritage Area, upon direction of the Board of Directors of the Mississippi Delta National Heritage Area and in conjunction with the Mississippi Department of Transportation, is authorized to erect appropriate signs and markers along public streets, roads, highways and interstates within the Mississippi Delta National Heritage Area.

The funding for the signs and markers and the erection of the signs and markers shall be made from any funds available to the Board of Directors of the Mississippi Delta National Heritage Area or from any gifts, grants or donations received by the board of directors for the purpose of providing the signs and markers.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2017, ch. 311, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2017.